District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.30

Designation of legal defense depositories.

Each legal defense committee accepting contributions or making expenditures shall designate in the registration statement required under § 1-1163.28, one or more banks located in the District of Columbia as the legal defense depository or depositories of that legal defense committee. Each committee shall maintain a checking account or accounts at the depository or depositories and shall deposit any contributions received by the committee into that account or accounts. No expenditures may be made by a committee except by check drawn payable to the person to whom the expenditure is being made on that account.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 330, 59 DCR 1862